District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

1-1105.01

Definitions.

Repealed.

Aug. 14, 1974, 88 Stat. 462, Pub. L. 93-376, title V, § 501
Sept. 2, 1976, D.C. Law 1-79, title III, § 302, 23 DCR 2050
Apr. 23, 1977, D.C. Law 1-126, title III, § 302(b)-(i), title IV, § 402, 24 DCR 2372
Aug. 18, 1978, D.C. Law 2-101, § 3, 25 DCR 257
Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 3205(w), 25 DCR 5740
Apr. 23, 1980, D.C. Law 3-58, § 2(a), 27 DCR 963
Mar. 16, 1982, D.C. Law 4-88, § 3(i), 29 DCR 458
Apr. 12, 2000, D.C. Law 13-91, § 124(c), 47 DCR 520
April 27, 2012, D.C. Law 19-124, § 501(d), 59 DCR 1862
This section is referenced in § 1-636.02.
1981 Ed., § 1-1451.
1973 Ed., § 1-1171.
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 401(d) of Board of Ethics and Government Accountability Establishment and Comprehensive Ethics Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-298, January 29, 2012, 59 DCR 683).